Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-152
Common carriers; consignor; designation of means and routing of shipment.

When transportation is involved in connection with the sale of personal property and the price at which such personal property is sold is a delivered price at destination, the consignor may determine the means of transportation to be used and the routing of the shipment.

Laws 1965, c. 444, § 1, p. 1413;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 63.